Mississippi, session 2026, SB2014.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  Section 25-15-7, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 25-15-7.  Such health insurance shall not include: (a)  Expense incurred by or on account of an individual prior to July 1, 1972, as to him; (b)  Dental care and treatment, except dental surgery and appliances to the extent necessary for the correction of damage caused by accidental injury while covered by the plan, or as a direct result of disease covered by the plan, and except prosthetic teeth and permanent dental implants for children with oligodontia; (c)  Eyeglasses, hearing aids for individuals over the age of twenty-one (21) years, and examinations for the prescription or fitting thereof; (d)  Cosmetic surgery or treatment, except to the extent necessary for correction of damage by accidental injury while covered by the plan or as a direct result of disease covered by the plan; (e)  Services received in a hospital owned or operated by the United States government for which no charge is made; (f)  Services received for injury or sickness due to war or any act of war, whether declared or undeclared, which war or act of war shall have occurred after July 1, 1972; (g)  Expense for which the individual is not required to make payment; (h)  Expenses to the extent of benefits provided under any employer group plan other than this plan, in which the state participates in the cost thereof; and (i)  Such other expenses as may be excluded by regulations of the board. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.